Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 7 Wyoming Youth Treatment Center [Repealed]

§ 25-7-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 7, § 2.

Cross references. —

For general provisions pertaining to treatment for youthful offenders, see chapters 3 and 4 of this title.

As to decrees where a child is adjudged in need of supervision, see §

14-6-429

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1933, ch. 117, § 1, related to the powers and duties of the department of family services.

§ 25-7-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 25, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 25, § 1, related to payments for the care or support of children assigned to the state children's home.